Hawaii, session 2025, GM1334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
1 SECTION 1. Section 604-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows;
3 " [+] (b) [4-] There shall be appointed one or more district
4 judges for each judicial circuit. The district court of the
5 first circuit shall consist of fourteen judges, who shall be
6 styled as first, second, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh,
7 eighth, ninth, tenth, eleventh, twelfth, thirteenth, and
8 fourteenth judge, respectively. One of the district judges
9 shall hear landlord-tenant and small claims matters [7-] ; provided
10 that when in the discretion of the chief justice of the supreme
11 court the urgency or volume of cases so requires, the chief
12 justice may authorize the judge to substitute for or act in
13 addition to or otherwise in place of any other district judge of
14 the district court of the first circuit. The district court of
15 the second circuit shall consist of three judges, who shall be
16 styled as first, second, and third judge, respectively. The
17 district court of the third circuit shall consist of [throe]
2025-3301 HB401 GDI HMSO 1

Page 2 H.B. NO 401
H.D. 1
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
1 judges, who shall be styled as first, second, [-afid] third^
2 and fourth judge, respectively. The district court of the fifth
3 circuit shall consist of two judges who shall be styled as first
4 and second judge, respectively. The chief justice may designate
5 a judge in each circuit as the administrative judge for the
6 circuit."
7 SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
8 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
9 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3301 HB401 CDl HMSO 2

401
H.B. NO
:□b
w
o
o b
APPROVED this 26th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 401, HD 1, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 401, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai ‘ i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
56